District of Columbia statutes.
29-1012.06

Winding up.

(a)

A dissolved limited cooperative association shall wind up its activities and affairs, and except as provided in § 29-1012.07, continue after dissolution only for the purpose of winding up.

(b)

In winding up a limited cooperative association’s activities, the board of directors:

(1)

Shall discharge its liabilities, settle and close its activities, and marshal and distribute its assets; and

(2)

May:

(A)

Preserve the association or its property as a going concern for no more than a reasonable time;

(B)

Prosecute and defend actions and proceedings;

(C)

Settle disputes by mediation or arbitration;

(D)

Deliver to the Mayor for filing a statement of termination stating the name of the company and that the company is terminated;

(E)

Transfer the association’s property; and

(F)

Perform other acts necessary or appropriate to the winding up.

(c)

After dissolution and upon application of a limited cooperative association, a member, or a holder of financial rights, the Superior Court may order judicial supervision of the winding up of the association, including the appointment of a person to wind up the association’s activities, if:

(1)

After a reasonable time, the association has not wound up its activities; or

(2)

The applicant establishes other good cause.

(d)

If a person is appointed pursuant to subsection (c) of this section to wind up the activities of a limited cooperative association, the association shall promptly deliver to the Mayor for filing an amendment to the articles of organization to reflect the appointment.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(j)(8)(A), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1002.01.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1206 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.